Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-227
Board; investigate conditions and practices; notice and hearing; order.

Whenever it appears to the board that practices prevail among barbers which tend to impair the health or efficiency of barbers or to endanger the health or safety of their patrons, the board shall investigate and determine whether such conditions or practices prevail. If such conditions or practices exist or are at risk of occurring, the board may, by official order and after due notice and hearing, adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to promote the purposes of the Barber Act.

Laws 1945, c. 174, § 3, p. 555;

Laws 1978, LB 722, § 21;

Laws 1997, LB 622, § 97.